Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
MERGER

[§414D-200] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Association" means an association
organized under chapter 421 or 421C.

"Merger" means the procedure
authorized by this part in which one domestic or foreign entity combines with
one or more domestic or foreign entities resulting in either one surviving
entity or one new entity.

"Organizing articles" means:

(1) For an association, corporation, or nonprofit
corporation, the articles of incorporation;

(2) For a general partnership or limited
liability partnership, the registration statement;

(3) For a limited partnership, the certificate of
limited partnership; and

(4) For a limited liability company, the articles of
organization.

"Other business entity" means a
profit corporation, limited liability company, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability partnership, or association. [L 2004, c 121, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next